Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1715
Sheriff; specialized equipment; damages to privately owned motor vehicle, reimbursement.

The county board shall purchase a base radio station and shortwave radio equipment for installation on a motor vehicle owned by the sheriff. The county board may purchase shortwave radio equipment for installation on motor vehicles owned by the sheriff's deputies and also may purchase specialized equipment such as, but not limited to, flashing lights or spotlights for installation on motor vehicles owned by the sheriff or his or her deputies whenever such equipment is necessary for law enforcement work. Any equipment so purchased and installed shall remain the property of the county and shall be removed and returned to the county upon termination of the term of office of such sheriff or deputy. The county board may also reimburse any such sheriff or deputy for any damage to any such privately owned motor vehicle peculiarly incident to and actually arising out of the use of such motor vehicle for law enforcement work, such as, but not limited to, bullet holes, blood stains, or damage to the interior caused by unruly prisoners, but not including collision or upset. Reimbursement for such damage shall be paid as other claims against the county.

Laws 1959, c. 84, § 7, p. 390;

Laws 1969, c. 169, § 1, p. 745;

Laws 1975, LB 427, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 893, § 1.